Florida, session 2026, SB856.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 46 47 Section 1.âSubsection (3) is added to section 689.261, 48 Florida Statutes, to read: 49 689.261âSale of residential property; disclosure of ad 50 valorem taxes to prospective purchaser.â 51 (3)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 52 1.ââListing platformâ means any public-facing online real 53 property listing service, including, but not limited to, 54 websites, web applications, and mobile applications. The term 55 does not include a social media platform as defined in s. 56 501.2041. 57 2.ââPropertyâ means residential real property located 58 within this state. 59 (b)âAny property visible on a listing platform must include 60 the estimated ad valorem taxes for such property. 61 1.âIf the ad valorem taxes are estimated using a tax 62 estimator or buyer payment calculator, the current ownerâs ad 63 valorem assessment or taxes may not be used to calculate the 64 estimated ad valorem taxes. The listing platform must calculate 65 and display the estimated ad valorem taxes using one of the 66 following methods: 67 a.âThe ad valorem taxes that would be due if the purchaser 68 were taxed on the listing price of the property at current 69 millage rates using the data and formula published under 70 subparagraph (d)1. The use of such data and formula constitutes 71 a reasonable estimate of ad valorem taxes. The listing platform 72 must include a disclaimer on the same website or application as 73 the estimated ad valorem taxes that the millage rates of 74 applicable taxing authorities may vary within a county and that 75 the estimated ad valorem taxes do not include all applicable 76 non-ad valorem assessments or exemptions, discounts, and other 77 tax benefits, including, but not limited to, transfer of the 78 homestead assessment difference under s. 4, Art. VII of the 79 State Constitution. The current ownerâs and any previous yearsâ 80 ad valorem taxes on the property may be displayed only as part 81 of historical tax information. 82 b.âThe ad valorem taxes that would be due if the purchaser 83 were taxed on the listing price of the property at the 84 countywide aggregate average millage rate using the data 85 published under subparagraph (d)2. The platform must include a 86 link to the property appraiserâs tax estimator for the county in 87 which the property is located, if available, or to such property 88 appraiserâs homepage. The Department of Revenue shall maintain a 89 table of links to each property appraiserâs homepage and tax 90 estimator, if available, on its website. The listing platform 91 must include a disclaimer on the same website or application as 92 the estimated ad valorem taxes stating that the millage rates of 93 applicable taxing authorities may vary within a county and that 94 the estimated ad valorem taxes do not include all applicable 95 non-ad valorem assessments or exemptions, discounts, and other 96 tax benefits, including, but not limited to, transfer of the 97 homestead assessment difference under s. 4, Art. VII of the 98 State Constitution. The current ownerâs and any previous yearsâ 99 ad valorem taxes on the property may be displayed only as part 100 of historical tax information. 101 2.âIf ad valorem taxes are not estimated using a tax 102 estimator or buyer payment calculator as provided in 103 subparagraph 1., the listing platform may not display the 104 current ownerâs ad valorem taxes and must include a link to the 105 property appraiserâs tax estimator for the county in which the 106 property is located, if available, or to such property 107 appraiserâs homepage. The department shall maintain a table of 108 links to each county property appraiserâs homepage and tax 109 estimator, if available, on its website. The previous yearâs ad 110 valorem taxes on the property may not be displayed as part of 111 historical tax information. 112 3.âThere is no liability on the part of, and no cause of 113 action may arise against, any person for an inaccurate 114 estimation of ad valorem taxes for a property listed on a 115 listing platform. 116 (c)âThe current ownerâs ad valorem taxes may not be 117 included in any printed listing materials concerning a property. 118 (d)1.âThe department shall develop a formula that may be 119 used by a listing platform to calculate the estimated ad valorem 120 taxes required under this subsection. Each county property 121 appraiser shall provide the department with any information 122 needed to develop the formula, including, at a minimum, the 123 county name, tax district code, school district millage rate, 124 and summary millage rate for all other applicable taxing 125 authorities. Beginning December 15, 2026, and annually 126 thereafter, the department shall publish on its website the 127 formula and the information collected from each property 128 appraiser under this subparagraph. 129 2.âThe department shall annually develop a countywide 130 aggregate average millage rate for each county which may be used 131 by a listing platform as an alternative method of meeting the 132 requirements of this subsection. The department shall require 133 each county property appraiser to provide the department with 134 any information needed to develop the countywide aggregate 135 average millage rate. Beginning December 15, 2026, and annually 136 thereafter, the department shall publish on its website the 137 countywide aggregate average millage rate and the information 138 collected from each property appraiser under this subparagraph. 139 (e)âThe department may adopt rules to implement paragraph 140 (d). 141 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect February 1, 2027.